Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.390

Emergency or transitional housing.

Names of individuals residing in emergency or transitional housing that are furnished to the department of revenue or a county assessor in order to substantiate a claim for property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.043 are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

[ 2005 c 274 s 419.]